Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 2. Confidential Intermediaries

§ 1-22-201.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Adoptee” means a person who, as a minor, was adopted pursuant to a final decree of adoption entered by a court;

“Adoptive parent” means an adult who has become a parent of a minor through the legal process of adoption;

“Adult” means a person eighteen (18) years of age or older;

“Biological grandparent” means a parent, by birth or adoption, of a biological parent;

“Biological parent” means a parent, by birth, of an adopted person;

“Biological sibling” means a sibling, by birth, of an adopted person;

“Chief justice” means the chief justice of the Wyoming supreme court;

“Confidential intermediary” means a person twenty-one (21) years of age or older who has completed a training program for confidential intermediaries which meets the standards set forth by the commission pursuant to W.S. 1-22-202(b) and who is authorized to inspect confidential relinquishment and adoption records at the request of an adult adoptee, adoptive parent, biological parent, biological sibling or biological grandparent;

“Consent” means voluntary, informed, written consent. Consent always shall be preceded by an explanation that the consent permits the confidential intermediary to arrange a personal contact among biological relatives;

“Court” means any court of record with jurisdiction over the matter at issue;

“This act” means W.S.

1-22-201

through

1-22-203

.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 125, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

“Wrongful adoption” causes of action against adoption agencies where children have or develop mental or physical problems that are misrepresented or not disclosed to adoptive parents, 74 ALR5th 1.

§ 1-22-202.
Commission created; powers; duties.

There is hereby created within the department of family services, an adoption intermediary commission of five (5) members. Representation and appointment of the members shall be as follows:

One (1) member shall represent the judicial branch and shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the chief justice;

One (1) member shall represent the department of family services and shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the director of the department;

One (1) member shall represent private adoption agencies and shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the director of the department of family services;

One (1) member shall represent programs which provide confidential intermediary services and shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the director of the department of family services;

One (1) member shall be an adult adoptee, adoptive parent or biological parent appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the director of the department of family services.

The commission shall have the responsibility for:

Drafting a manual of standards for training confidential intermediaries;

Monitoring confidential intermediary training programs to ensure compliance with the standards set forth in the manual with authority to approve or deny such programs based upon compliance with such standards;

Maintaining an up-to-date list of persons who have completed training as confidential intermediaries and communicating that list to the judicial branch.

The commission shall adopt rules for its own procedure. The commission shall select a chairman, a vice-chairman, and such other officers as it deems necessary, and shall keep a record of its proceedings. The commission shall meet as often as necessary to carry out its duties, but in no instance shall it meet less than semiannually. The commission may seek input from confidential intermediary organizations in carrying out its duties.

The commission shall be voluntary and no state funds or personnel, except members of the commission appointed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, shall be used in its operation. The commission may accept gifts and grants and expend funds received to carry out its duties.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 125, § 1.

§ 1-22-203.
Confidential
intermediaries; confidential intermediary services.

Any person who has completed a confidential intermediary training program which meets the standards set forth by the commission shall be responsible for notifying the commission that his name should be included on the list of confidential intermediaries to be maintained by the commission and made available to the judicial branch. The commission’s rules shall specify when and under what conditions the name of a confidential intermediary shall be removed from the list available to the judicial branch. Once a person is included on such list, he shall be:

Authorized to inspect confidential relinquishment and adoption records, as ordered by the court, upon motion to the court by an adult adoptee, adoptive parent, biological parent, biological sibling or biological grandparent;

Available, subject to time constraints, for appointment by the court to act as a confidential intermediary for an adult adoptee, adoptive parent, biological parent, biological sibling or biological grandparent.

Any adult adoptee, adoptive parent, biological parent, biological sibling or biological grandparent who is eighteen (18) years of age or older may file a motion, with supporting affidavit, in the court where the adoption took place or in the court in which parental rights were terminated pursuant to W.S.

14-2-308

through

14-2-319

, to appoint one (1) or more confidential intermediaries for the purpose of determining the whereabouts of the unknown biological relative or relatives, except that no one shall seek to determine the whereabouts of a relative who is a minor. The court may rule on the motion and affidavit without hearing and may appoint a confidential intermediary. Costs related to the proceeding and investigation shall be the responsibility of the party filing the motion for appointment and investigation.

Any information obtained by the confidential intermediary during the course of his investigation shall be kept strictly confidential and shall be utilized only for the purpose of arranging a contact between the individual who initiated the search and the sought-after biological relative.

When a sought-after biological relative is located by a confidential intermediary on behalf of the individual who initiated the search:

Contact shall be made between the parties involved in the investigation only when written consent for such contact has been obtained from both parties and filed with the court;

If consent for personal communication is not obtained from both parties, all relinquishment and adoption records and any information obtained by any confidential intermediary during the course of his investigation shall be returned to the court and shall remain confidential.

Any person acting as a confidential intermediary who knowingly fails to comply with the provisions of subsections (c) and (d) of this section shall be subject to citation and punishment for contempt as provided by Rule 42, Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 125, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (e), substituted “Rule 42” for “Rule 41.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Quoted

in

Shippey v. Rogers (In re Estate of Kirkpatrick), 2003 WY 125, 77 P.3d 404,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

Sanderson v. Bathrick (In re Estate of Seader), 2003 WY 119, 76 P.3d 1236,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2003).